Utah statutes.
61-1-18.2.   Budget -- Annual report.

The director shall annually prepare and submit to the executive director:

(1)  a budget for the expenses of the division and commission for the administration and enforcement of this chapter for the next fiscal year; and

(2)  a report outlining the division's and commission's work for the preceding fiscal year.



Amended by Chapter 351, 2009 General Session

